Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202637-1804
Water Recreation Enhancement Fund; created; use; investment.

(1) The Water Recreation Enhancement Fund is created. The fund shall be administered by the Game and Parks Commission. The State Treasurer shall credit to the fund any money transferred to the fund by the Legislature and such donations, gifts, bequests, or other money received from any federal or state agency or public or private source. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, the fund shall be used for water and recreational projects pursuant to the Water Recreation Enhancement Act or for campground expansion projects, road repair projects, and general infrastructure and maintenance projects, with two-thirds used for projects at the Lewis and Clark State Recreation Area and one-third used for projects at the Lake McConaughy State Recreation Area. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Water Recreation Enhancement Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Any investment earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the General Fund.

(2) For any amount credited to the Water Recreation Enhancement Fund from a source other than a transfer authorized by the Legislature, the State Treasurer shall transfer an equal amount from the Water Recreation Enhancement Fund to the Jobs and Economic Development Initiative Fund at the end of the fiscal year in which such funds were credited, on such dates as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services to be used pursuant to section 61-405.

(3) The Department of Administrative Services shall establish a subaccount within the Water Recreation Enhancement Fund for the accounting of any money transferred to the fund from the Nebraska Environmental Trust Fund. Any money transferred from the Nebraska Environmental Trust Fund to the Water Recreation Enhancement Fund shall be expended in accordance with section 81-15,168. -

Laws 2022, LB1012, § 8;

Laws 2023, LB818, § 9;

Laws 2024, LB1413, § 34;

Laws 2024, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 10;

Laws 2025, LB264, § 127;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 133.
April 8, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.

Water Recreation Enhancement Act, see section 37-1801.